Washington statutes.
RCW 6.15.030

Insurance money on exempt property exempt.

If property, which by the laws of this state is exempt from execution, attachment, or garnishment, is insured and the same is lost, stolen, or destroyed, then the insurance money coming to or belonging to the person thus insured, to an amount equal to the exempt property thus destroyed, shall be exempt from execution, attachment, and garnishment.

[ 1987 c 442 s 303; 1895 c 76 s 1; RRS s 568. Formerly RCW 6.16.050.]